 
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
 
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K/A
Amendment No. 1
 
x  ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
ACT OF 1934
For the ﬁscal year ended: December 31, 2019
 
OR
 
¨  TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from              to
 
Commission File Number: 1-14066
 
 
 
 
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
(Exact name of registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
    
Delaware   13-3849074
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. Employer
Identiﬁcation No.)
 
 
    
1440 East Missouri Avenue Suite 160 Phoenix,
AZ  85014
(Address of principal executive oﬃces)   (Zip code)
 
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (602) 264-1375
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
Title of each class:  Trading Symbol Name of each exchange on which registered:
Common stock, par value
$0.01 per share  SCCO   New York Stock Exchange
Lima Stock Exchange
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405
of the Securities Act. Yes x No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or
Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ¨ No x
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by
Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to ﬁle such reports), and (2) has been subject to such
ﬁling requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive
Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter)
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
such ﬁles). Yes x No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a
non-accelerated ﬁler, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See deﬁnitions of
“large accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
Large accelerated
ﬁler x Accelerated ﬁler ¨Non-accelerated ﬁler ¨ Smaller reporting
company ¨
 
   Emerging growth
company ¨
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use
the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards
provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the
Act).  Yes ¨  No x
 
At April 23, 2020, there were of record 773,058,869 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per
share, outstanding.
 
The aggregate market value of the shares of common stock (based upon the closing price at April
23, 2020 as reported on the New York Stock Exchange-Composite Transactions) of Southern Copper
Corporation held by non-aﬃliates was approximately $2,649.0 million.
 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE:
 
The following documents (or parts thereof) are incorporated by reference:
 
NONE
 
 
 
 
 
 
Southern Copper Corporation
  
  Page No.
   
EXPLANATORY NOTE 2
PART III.   
Item 10.Directors, Executive Oﬃcers and Corporate Governance 3-8
Item 11.Executive Compensation 8-26
Item 12.Security Ownership of Certain Beneﬁcial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 26-28
Item 13.Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 29-32
Item 14.Principal Accounting Fees and Services 33
PART IV.   
Item 15.Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedule 34
  Signatures 35
 
 
1
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
 
On February 28, 2020, Southern Copper Corporation, (“SCC,” “us,” “our,” or the “Company”) ﬁled its
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2019 (the “Original Form 10-K”).
This Amendment No. 1 (the “Amendment”) amends Part III, Items 10 through 14 of the Original Form 10-
K to include information previously omitted from the Original Form 10-K in reliance on General
Instruction G(3) to Form 10-K. General Instruction G(3) to Form 10-K which provides that registrants may
incorporate by reference certain information from a deﬁnitive proxy statement which involves the
election of directors if such deﬁnitive proxy statement is ﬁled with the Securities and Exchange
Commission within 120 days after the end of the ﬁscal year. The Company does not anticipate that its
deﬁnitive proxy statement involving the election of directors will be ﬁled before April 29, 2020 (i.e.,
within 120 days after the end of the Company’s 2019 ﬁscal year). Accordingly, Part III of the Original
Form 10-K is hereby amended and restated as set forth below. The information included herein as
required by Part III, Items 10 through 14 of Form 10-K is more limited than what is required to be
included in the deﬁnitive proxy statement to be ﬁled in connection with our annual meeting of
stockholders. Accordingly, the deﬁnitive proxy statement to be ﬁled at a later date will include additional
information related to the topics herein and additional information not required by Part III, Items 10
through 14 of Form 10-K.
 
In addition, as required by Rule 12b-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, new
certiﬁcations by our principal executive oﬃcers and principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer are ﬁled as exhibits to this
Amendment under Item 15 of Part IV hereof.
 
Because no ﬁnancial statements are included in this Amendment and this Amendment does not contain
or amend any disclosure with respect to Items 307 and 308 of Regulation S-K, paragraphs 3, 4, and 5 of
the certiﬁcations have been omitted. Further we are amending the cover page of the Original Form 10-K
to update the number of shares of Company stock outstanding, the market value of shares held by non-
aﬃliates and to remove that information is being incorporated by reference from our deﬁnitive proxy
statement. We are also amending the date of our annual meeting of stockholders, which due to the
uncertainties resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic was postponed to July 24, 2020.
 
Except as described above, no other changes have been made to the Original Form 10-K. In addition,
except as stated herein, this Amendment does not reﬂect events occurring after the ﬁling of the Original
Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 28, 2020 and no attempt has been
made in this Amendment to modify or update other disclosures as presented in the Original Form 10-K.
 
 
2
 
 
PART III
 
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Oﬃcers and Corporate Governance.
 
For information relating to our executive oﬃcers, please see “Information about our Executive Oﬃcers”
in Part III Item 10 of the Original Form 10-K.
 
Directors
 
The information provided below is biographical information about each of our directors, including other
company board memberships. Age and other information in each director’s biography are as of
December 31, 2019.
  
Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco, 66. Mr. Larrea has been Chairman of the Board of Directors since
December 1999, Chief Executive Oﬃcer from December 1999 to October 2004, and a member of our
Board of Directors since November 1999. He has been Chairman of the board of directors, President and
Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Grupo México, S.A.B. de C.V. (“Grupo Mexico”) (holding) since 1994. Mr. Larrea
has been Chairman of the board of directors and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano,
S.A. de C.V. (railroad company) since 1997. Mr. Larrea was previously Executive Vice Chairman of Grupo
Mexico and has been member of the board of directors since 1981. He is also Chairman of the board of
directors and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Empresarios Industriales de México, S.A. de C.V. (“EIM”) (holding)
and Fondo Inmobiliario (real estate company), since 1992.
 
Mr. Larrea presides over every Board meeting and since 1999 has been contributing to the Company his
education, his leadership skills, industry knowledge, strategic vision, informed judgment and over 20
years of business experience, especially in the mining sector.  As Chairman and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
of Grupo Mexico, of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano, S.A. de C.V. and of EIM, a holding company engaged in
a variety of business, including mining, construction, railways, real estate, and drilling, he brings to the
Company a valuable mix of business experience in diﬀerent industries. 
 
Oscar González Rocha, 82. Mr. González Rocha has been our President since December 1999 and our
President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer since October 21, 2004. He has been a director of the Company
since November 1999. Mr. González Rocha has been Chief Executive Oﬃcer and director of Asarco LLC
(integrated US copper producer), an aﬃliate of the Company, since August 2010 and President and Chief
Executive Oﬃcer of Americas Mining Corporation ("AMC") a holding company of Grupo Mexico, since
2015. Previously, he was the Company’s President and General Director and Chief Operating Oﬃcer from
December 1999 to October 20, 2004. Mr. González Rocha has been a director of Grupo Mexico since
2002. He was General Director of Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V. from 1986 to 1999 and of Buenavista
del Cobre, S.A. de C.V. (formerly Mexicana de Cananea, S.A. de C.V.) from 1990 to 1999. He was an
alternate director of Grupo Mexico from 1998 to April 2002. Mr. González Rocha is a civil engineer with a
degree from the Autonomous National University of Mexico ("UNAM") in Mexico City, Mexico.
 
Mr. González Rocha is a civil engineer by profession and a business man with over 40 years of
experience in the mining industry. He has been associated with our Mexican operations since 1976. His
contributions to the Company include his professional skills, his leadership, an open mind and a
willingness to listen to diﬀerent opinions. Mr. González Rocha has proven his ability to deal with crises to
lessen negative impacts to the Company. His devotion of time to the Company and his hands-on
management of the operations in Mexico and Peru contribute to his eﬀective leadership of the Company.
Mr. González Rocha has been recognized as Copper Man of the Year 2015 and was inducted into the
American Mining Hall of Fame in December 2016 in Tucson, Arizona and into the Mexican Mining Hall of
Fame in October 2017 in Guadalajara, Mexico.
 
Mr. Vicente Ariztegui Andreve, Independent Director, 66. Mr. Ariztegui Andreve has been a director of the
Company since April 25, 2018. Mr. Ariztegui Andreve is Managing Director and Chairman of Aonia
Holding, a wholly owned private investment ﬁrm he founded in 1989.  Aonia has made investments in
the following industries: gold mining, global commodity trading, retailing (e.g. duty free shops),
infrastructure (e.g. airport terminal operation), asset management and real estate.  During the last ﬁve
years, Mr. Ariztegui has been actively selling and buying stakes in non-public companies, including
Pallium Trading (ﬁsh meal) and MK Metal Trading (copper, zinc, lead, gold and silver concentrates). He
also sold Aonia’s equity stake in Fumisa and Aerodom, airport terminal operating companies in Mexico
City and in the Dominican Republic, respectively.  In 2013, Mr. Ariztegui Andreve made inroads in the
ﬁnancial asset management business by acquiring a stake in InverCap, the ﬁfth largest pension fund
manager in Mexico, which he sold in April 2017.  Mr. Ariztegui Andreve worked as a Corporate Banker
and Vice President of international operations and trade ﬁnance for Citibank in New York and Mexico City
for eight years (1979-1987).  Mr. Ariztegui Andreve co-founded and was President and Chief Executive
Oﬃcer of MK Metal Trading, a global based metal and mineral (copper, zinc, lead, gold and silver
concentrates) trading company start-up for 18 years (1994-2012). MK Metal Trading was sold in 2012. 
Mr. Ariztegui Andreve currently sits on the boards of several non-public companies, including InverCap
Holding (ﬁnancial assets management), Reim (real estate mid-size residential development), Alvamex
(international storage and logistics). He also is a director of the University Club, in Mexico. Previously, he
was director of Dufry AG (leading global retail and airport duty free operator), Latin American Airport
Holdings (airport infrastructure and terminal operator), Satelites Mexicanos (SATMEX)
(telecommunications), Banco Mexicano, Grupo Financiero Inverlat (ﬁnancial services) and Minera Santa
Gertrudis (mining).  During the last ﬁve years Mr. Ariztegui did not serve as a director of any other US
public company.  Mr. Ariztegui Andreve received a Master in Business Administration degree from the
Wharton School of Business and Finance and a Master in Systems Engineering degree from the
University of Pennsylvania.
 
 
3
 
 
Mr. Ariztegui Andreve brings to the Company his vast experience in the ﬁnancial, mining and commercial
 sectors. He also adds to the Board of Directors his leadership experience and expertise attained through
his participation as a director of other companies.
 
Alfredo Casar Pérez, 66. Mr. Casar Pérez has been a director of the Company since October 26, 2006. He
has been a member of the board of directors of Grupo Mexico since 1997. He is also a member of the
board of directors of Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V., an aﬃliated company of Grupo Mexico, since
1998 and its Chief Executive Oﬃcer since 1999. From 1992 to 1999, Mr. Casar Pérez served as General
Director and member of the board of directors of Compañía Perforadora México, S.A. de C.V. and México
Compañía Constructora, S.A. de C.V., two aﬃliated companies of Grupo Mexico. Mr. Casar Pérez served
as Project Director of ISEFI, a subsidiary of Banco Internacional, in 1991 and as Executive Vice President
of Grupo Costamex in 1985. Mr. Casar Pérez also worked for the Real Estate Firm, Agricultural Ministry,
and the College of Mexico. Mr. Casar Pérez holds a degree in Economics from the Autonomous
Technological Institute of Mexico, ITAM, and a degree in Industrial Engineering from Anáhuac University
of Mexico City, Mexico. He also holds a Master’s degree in Economics from the University of Chicago in
Chicago, Illinois.
 
Mr. Casar Pérez has been associated with Grupo Mexico or its aﬃliated companies in diﬀerent executive
positions for more than 21 years.  He contributes to the Company his background in engineering and
economics, his extensive business experience, his high performance standards, leadership and mature
conﬁdence. As Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V., Mr. Casar Pérez contributes to
the Company a unique experience and ability to address challenging issues and propose creative
solutions.
 
Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada, Independent Director, 63. Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada has been a
director of the Company since July 26, 2010. From May 2013, Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada has been
Senior Partner of Ventura Capital Privado, S.A. de C.V. (Mexican ﬁnancial company), and, since October
2013, he has been Chairman of the board of directors of Maxcom Telecomunicaciones, S.A.B. de C.V.
(Mexican telecommunications company).
 
From April 2011 to May 2013, Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada was a senior advisor at Grupo Financiero
Banorte, S.A.B. de C.V.(“GFNorte”) a ﬁnancial holding institution that controls a bank, a broker dealer
and other ﬁnancial institutions in Mexico.  From October 2000 to March 2011, Mr. Castillo Sánchez
Mejorada was the Chairman of the board of directors and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Ixe Grupo Financiero,
S.A.B. de C.V., a Mexican ﬁnancial holding company that merged into GFNorte in April 2011. In addition,
from March 2007 to March 2009, Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada was the President of the Mexican
Banking Association (Asociación de Bancos de México).  Since November 2016, Mr. Castillo Sánchez
Mejorada has been Chairman of the Board of Banco Nacional de Mexico, S.A. (Citibanamex), one of the
largest banks in Mexico and serves as an independent director on the board of directors of (i) Grupo
Herdez, S.A.B. de C.V., a Mexican holding company for the manufacture, sale and distribution of food
products; (ii) Alfa, S.A.B. de C.V., a Mexico-based holding company that, through its subsidiaries, is
engaged in the petrochemical, food processing, automotive and telecommunication sectors; (iii) Médica
Sur, S.A.B. de C.V., a Mexico-based company engaged in the hospital business; and (iv) UNIFIN, an
independent leasing company. He is also a Senior Advisor for General Atlantic in Mexico, a private equity
ﬁrm based out of New York. From April 2012 to April 2016, Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada served as a
member of the board of directors of Organización Cultiba, S.A.B. de C.V. (formerly Grupo Embotelladoras
Unidas, S.A.B. de C.V.), a Mexico-based holding company primarily engaged in the beverage industry.
From April 2012 until April 2014, Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada served as an independent director on the
board and as a member of the audit committee of Grupo Aeroportuario del Paciﬁco, S.A.B. de C.V., a
Mexico-based and New Yorrk Stock Exchange (“NYSE”)-listed company that operates, maintains and
develops twelve airports in the Paciﬁc and central regions of Mexico. From April 2010 until 2013, Mr.
Castillo Sánchez Mejorada was a member of the board of directors of Grupo Casa Saba, S.A.B. de C.V., a
Mexican wholesale distributor of pharmaceutical, health, beauty and other consumer products and
operator of a retail pharmacy chain. Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada has been a member of the audit
committee of Alfa, S.A.B. de C.V. since 2010. Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada holds a Bachelor’s degree in
Business Administration from the Anáhuac University, in Mexico City, Mexico.
 
 
4
 
 
Mr. Castillo Sánchez Mejorada became a member of our Audit Committee on April 18, 2013. Mr. Castillo
Sánchez Mejorada brings to the Company more than 39 years of experience in the ﬁnancial sector. He
also adds to the Board of Directors his leadership experience and expertise attained through his
participation as an independent director of other companies.
 
Xavier García de Quevedo Topete,73. Mr. García de Quevedo has been a director of the Company since
November 1999. He was our Chief Operating Oﬃcer from April 12, 2005 until April 23, 2015. Since
November 1, 2014, Mr. Garcia de Quevedo Topete has served as the President of the infrastructure
division of Grupo Mexico, composed of the energy, gas, oil and construction subsidiaries of Grupo
Mexico. He is also Vice-chairman of Grupo Mexico. He was the President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of
Southern Copper Minera Mexico from September 2001 until November 1, 2014. He was the President
and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Americas Mining Corporation from September 7, 2007 to October 31,
2014. From December 2009 to June 2010, he was Chairman and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Asarco LLC.
Previously he was President of Asarco LLC from November 1999 to September 2001. Mr. García de
Quevedo began his professional career in 1969 with Grupo Mexico. He was President of Grupo
Ferroviario Mexicano, S.A. de C.V. and of Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V. from December 1997 to
December 1999, and Executive Vice President of Exploration and Development of Grupo Mexico from
1994 to 1997. He has been a director of Grupo Mexico since April 2002. He was also Vice President of
Grupo Condumex, S.A. de C.V. (telecommunications, electronics and automotive parts producer) for
eight years. Mr. García de Quevedo was the Chairman of the Mining Chamber of Mexico from
November 2006 to August 2009. He is a chemical engineer with a degree from the UNAM in Mexico City,
Mexico. He also attended a continuous business administration and ﬁnance program at the Technical
Institute of Monterrey in Monterrey, Mexico.
 
Mr. García de Quevedo contributes to the Company his extensive business experience and leadership,
his industry knowledge, his skills to motivate high-performing talent, and his general management
skills. During his more than 40 years of experience as an executive with Grupo Mexico and subsidiaries,
he was responsible for developing the integration strategy of Grupo Mexico. He was directly responsible
for the development of the copper smelter, reﬁnery, precious metal and rod plants of Grupo
Mexico. Mr. García de Quevedo also headed the process for the acquisition of railroad concessions for
Grupo Mexico, the formation of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano, S.A. de C.V. and its partnership with Union
Paciﬁc. Previously, he had a distinguished career as Vice President of sales and marketing for Grupo
Condumex, S.A. de C.V., where among other achievements, he was responsible for the formation of a
division for the sale, marketing and distribution of products in the United States and Latin America and
where he headed the Telecommunications division. Mr. García de Quevedo also contributes to the
Company his diversiﬁed business experience gained from having served on the boards of diﬀerent
Mexican and United States companies and as Chairman of the Mining Chamber of Mexico.
 
 
5
 
 
Rafael A. Mac Gregor Anciola, Independent Director, 59. Mr. Mac Gregor has been a director of the
Company since July 2017. Mr. Mac Gregor has served as managing Partner of RMAC Asociados (Mexican
consulting ﬁrm) since 2016. He has been an independent director of the Board of Grupo Financiero
Citibanamex (Mexican banking company), Chairman of its Risk Committee and member of Citibanamex’s
Audit Committee since 2016. He is also an independent member of the board of directors of Black Rock
Mexico (asset management). In addition, he has been an independent member of the board of directors
of Corporación Multi Inversiones (CMI) (multi-national agro-industrial company) since 2016. From
February 1999 to July 2015, he served as a Corporate Director of Grupo Bal (Mexican companies
principally engaged in agricultural and livestock, commercial operations, industrial operations, and
ﬁnancial services businesses). From April 1999 to 2015, he was a member of the board of directors of
the Mexican Stock Exchange. From 2001 to 2016, he served as a member of the board of the Instituto
Tecnológico Autónomo de México (ITAM) and from April 2008 to 2016, he served as a member of the
board of Fresnillo PLC (Mexican-based mining company). From April 1995 to July 2015, he served as
President of the board of a Mexican Brokerage House and Valmex Leasing Company (Mexican leasing
company).
 
Additionally, from April 1995 to July 2015, Mr. Mac Gregor Anciola served on the boards of Grupo
Nacional Provincial, S.A.B. (Mexican insurance company), Grupo Palacio de Hierro, S.A.B. (Mexican
department stores), Industrias Peñoles, S.A.B. (Mexican mining company), Crédito Aﬁanzador, S.A.
(Mexican ﬁnancing company), Minera Tizapa, S.A. de C.V. (Mexican mining company), Minera Penmont,
S.A. de C.V.(Mexican mining company), Profuturo G.N.P., S.A. de C.V., Afore, Profuturo GNP Pensiones,
S.A. de C.V. (Mexican insurance and pension holding company) and Vice President of the MexDer
(Mexican derivatives exchange). Mr. Mac Gregor Anciola holds the recognition of the Professional Merit
Award from ITAM. Mr. Mac Gregor Anciola holds a degree in Business Administration from the Instituto
Tecnológico Autónomo de México in Mexico City and he attended the Stanford University Executive
program in Palo Alto, California. Mr.  Mac Gregor Anciola brings to the Company more than 30 years of
experience in the ﬁnancial sector. He also adds to the Board of Directors his leadership experience and
expertise attained through his participation as a director of the Mexican Stock Exchange and as an
independent director of various other companies.
 
Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla, Special Independent Director, 60. Dr. Palomino has been a director of the
Company since March 19, 2004. Dr. Palomino is a member of the board of directors and Vice-chairman of
the Central Bank of Peru (Banco Central de Reserva del Peru) since September 2016, a director of the
Master’s in Finance Program at the University of the Paciﬁc in Lima, Peru since July 2009, a member of
the board of directors of Laboratorios Portugal (personal care products manufacturer) since September
2017, and a member of the board of directors of Summa Capital, S. A. (corporate consulting ﬁrm) since
April 2014. Dr. Palomino was Chairman of the board of directors of Aventura Plaza, S.A. (commercial real
estate developer and operator) from January 2008 to June 2016, member of the board of directors and
Manager of the Peruvian Economic Institute (economic think tank) from April 2009 to August 2016,
Partner of Proﬁt Consultoria e Inversiones (a ﬁnancial consulting ﬁrm) from July 2007 to July 2016, and a
member of the board of directors and chairman of the audit committee of the Bolsa de Valores de Lima
(Lima Stock Exchange) from March 2013 to July 2016. Dr. Palomino was Principal and Senior Consultant
of Proconsulta International (ﬁnancial consulting) from September 2003 to June 2007. He was First Vice
President and Chief Economist, Latin America, for Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith, New York
(investment banking) from 2000 to 2002. He was Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Senior Country and Equity
Analyst of Merrill Lynch, Peru (investment banking) from 1995 to 2000. Dr. Palomino has held various
positions with banks and ﬁnancial institutions as an economist, ﬁnancial advisor and analyst. He has a
PhD in ﬁnance from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
and graduated from the Economics Program of the University of the Paciﬁc in Lima, Peru.
 
Dr. Palomino is a member of our Audit Committee and a special independent director nominee.  He is
also our “audit committee ﬁnancial expert,” as the term is deﬁned by the SEC. Dr. Palomino contributes
to the Company his education in economics and ﬁnance, acquired from extensive academic studies,
including a PhD in Finance from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania in Philadelphia,
Pennsylvania, his expertise, his wise counsel, and his extensive business experience gained from his
past and current activities from serving as a ﬁnancial analyst, including of the mining sectors in Mexico
and Peru.
 
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes, Special Independent Director, 77. Mr. Perezalonso has been a director of
the Company since June 2002. Currently, Mr. Perezalonso is a member of the board of directors of
Gigante, S.A. de C.V. (retail and real estate) and Blasky (hotel chain in Baja California, Mexico). He is also
National Vice President of the Cruz Roja Mexicana (Red Cross). Mr. Perezalonso was Chairman of the
board of directors of Volaris Compañía de Aviación, S.A.P.I. de C.V. (airline) from March 2, 2011 to
November 2014. He was Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Corporación Geo, S.A. de C.V. (housing construction)
from February 2006 to February 2007. Mr. Perezalonso was the Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Aeroméxico
(Aerovías de México, S.A. de C.V.) (airline company) from 2004 until December 2005. From 1998 until
April 2001, he was Executive Vice President of Administration and Finance of Grupo Televisa, S.A.B.
(media company). From 1980 until February 1998, Mr. Perezalonso held various positions with Grupo
Cifra, S.A. de C.V. (retail and department stores), the most recent position being that of General Director
of Administration and Finance. He was also a member of the Advisory Council of Banco Nacional de
México, S.A. de C.V. (banking), the board of directors and the investment committee of Afore Banamex
(banking), the board and the investment committee of Siefore Banamex No. 1 (banking), Masnegocio Co.
S. de R.L. de C.V. (information technology), Intellego (technology), Telefónica Móviles México, S.A. de C.V.
(wireless communication), Marhnos Construction Company (housing construction), and Fomento de
Investigación y Cultura Superior, A.C. (Foundation of the Iberoamerican University in Mexico).
Mr. Perezalonso was also a director of Cablevision, S.A. de C.V., and a member of the audit committee of
Grupo Televisa, S.A.B. from March 1998 to September 2009.  Mr. Perezalonso has a law degree from the
Iberoamerican University in Mexico City, Mexico and a Master’s degree in Business Administration from
the Business Administration Graduate School for Central America (INCAE) in Nicaragua. Mr. Perezalonso
has also attended a Corporate Finance program at Harvard University in Cambridge, Massachusetts.
 
 
6
 
 
Mr. Perezalonso is a member of our Audit Committee and a special independent director nominee.
 Mr. Perezalonso contributes to the Company his legal and ﬁnancial education acquired from extensive
academic studies, including a Master’s degree in Business Administration from INCAE in Nicaragua, and
his business experience acquired serving in the ﬁnancial areas of several companies and as Chief
Executive Oﬃcer of diﬀerent companies. Mr. Perezalonso also brings to the Board of Directors his
informed judgment and his diversiﬁed business experience gained from serving on the boards of
directors of diﬀerent Mexican companies.
 
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán, Special Independent Director, 70. Mr. Ruiz Sacristán has been a director of the
Company since February 12, 2004. Since November 2001, he has been the owner and Managing Partner
of Proyectos Estrategicos Integrales, a Mexican investment-banking ﬁrm specialized in agricultural,
transport, tourism, and housing projects. Mr. Ruiz Sacristán has held various distinguished positions in
the Mexican government, the most recent being that of Secretary of Communications and Transportation
of Mexico from 1995 to 2000. While holding that position, he was also Chairman of the board of directors
of the Mexican-owned companies in the sector, and member of the board of directors of development
banks. He was also the Chairman of the board of directors of Asarco LLC. Mr. Ruiz Sacristán is Chairman
of the board of directors and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Sempra’s Energy North America Infrastructure
Group since September 2018. Prior to this appointment, Mr. Ruiz Sacristán was Chairman and Chief
Executive Oﬃcer of IEnova, the Mexican operating subsidiary of Sempra Energy from 2012 to 2018 and
a member of the board of directors of Sempra Energy from 2007 to 2012. Mr. Ruiz Sacristán remains as
Chairman of IEnova. He is a member of the boards of directors of Constructora y Perforadora Latina, S.A.
de C.V. (Mexican geothermal exploration and drilling company) and of Banco Ve Por Mas, S.A. (Mexican
bank). Mr. Ruiz Sacristán holds a Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration from the Anáhuac
University in Mexico City, Mexico, and a Master's degree in Business Administration from Northwestern
University in Chicago, Illinois.
 
Mr. Ruiz Sacristán is one of our special independent director nominees. Mr. Ruiz Sacristán contributes to
the Company his extensive business studies, including a Master’s Degree in Business Administration
from Northwestern University in Chicago, Illinois, his investment banking experience and his broad
business experience as a former Chief Executive Oﬃcer of PEMEX (Mexican oil company), combined with
his distinguished career in the Mexican government as a former Secretary of Communications and
Transport of Mexico and as a director of Mexican-owned enterprises and ﬁnancial institutions. Mr. Ruiz
Sacristán also brings to the Board of Directors his informed judgment and his diversiﬁed business
experience gained from serving on the board of directors and of the audit, and environmental and
technology committees of Sempra Energy, a Fortune 500 energy service company, based in San Diego,
California, as the former Chairman of Asarco LLC, and as the Chief Executive Oﬃcer of IEnova.
 
Director Nominations Process
 
During the 2019 ﬁscal year, we made no material changes to the nomination procedures of our Board of
Directors or of the Special Nominating Committee by which stockholders may recommend nominees to
our Board of Directors, as described in our most recent proxy statement.
 
 
7
 
 
Information About our Audit Committee
 
The Board of Directors has a separately designated standing Audit Committee. The members of the
Audit Committee are Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla, Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes, and Enrique Castillo
Sánchez Mejorada. The Board of Directors has determined that the members of the Audit Committee are
independent of management and ﬁnancially literate in accordance with the requirements of the NYSE
and the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”), as such requirements are interpreted by our
Board of Directors in its business judgment. In addition, the Board of Directors determined that Mr. Luis
Miguel Palomino Bonilla is the Audit Committee ﬁnancial expert, as the Board of Directors interprets this
requirement in its business judgment. The Board of Directors also determined that Mr. Palomino satisﬁes
the accounting or related ﬁnancial management expertise standard required by the NYSE, as the Board
of Directors interprets this requirement in its business judgment.
 
Code of Business Conduct
 
We have in place a Code of Business Conduct and Ethics that applies to our principal executive oﬃcer,
principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer, comptroller, all other oﬃcers, directors and our employees, including the
persons performing accounting or ﬁnancial functions. The Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, may be
accessed free of charge by visiting our web site at www.southerncoppercorp.com. We intend to report
any amendments to, or waiver from, a provision of the Code of Business Conduct and Ethics that applies
to the principal executive oﬃcer, principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer, principal accounting oﬃcer, comptroller,
director, and other persons performing similar functions as required by the NYSE rules.
 
Delinquent Section 16 (a) Reports
 
Based on our records and other information, we believe that all ﬁling requirements of the SEC applicable
to our executive oﬃcers, directors, and owners of more than ten percent of our Common Stock were
complied with in 2019 with the exception of one of our directors. Mr. Enrique Castillo Sanchez Mejorada
ﬁled one late report covering the sale of 12,825 shares on November 11, 2019.
 
Item 11. Executive Compensation
 
Compensation Discussion and Analysis
 
Compensation Committee Report
 
Our Company was acquired in late 1999 by Grupo Mexico, our indirect majority stockholder, which owns
88.9% of our stock as of December 31, 2019. Because we are a controlled company as deﬁned by the
NYSE we do not have a Compensation Committee comprised entirely by independent directors.
Moreover, because we are a controlled company, as deﬁned under Rule 10C-1(c)(3) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, we are exempt from Rule 10C-1 of such act. The Compensation
Committee is composed of Messrs. Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco, our Chairman, Oscar González Rocha,
our President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Xavier García de Quevedo Topete, a director, and Gilberto
Perezalonso Cifuentes, an independent director.
 
The Committee shall have the authority to delegate any of its authority to subcommittees designated by
the Committee to the extent permitted by law. The Committee may delegate its administrative duties to
the Chief Executive Oﬃcer or other members of senior management, as permitted by applicable law and
regulation.
 
 
8
 
 
The Compensation Committee reviewed and discussed the Compensation Discussion and Analysis with
management of the Company. Based on said review and discussion, the Compensation Committee has
recommended to our Board of Directors the inclusion of the Compensation Discussion and Analysis in
the 2019 Annual Report on Form 10-K and this report.
 
  The Compensation Committee:
  Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco
  Oscar González Rocha
  Xavier García de Quevedo Topete
  Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes
 
This Compensation Discussion and Analysis describes the compensation approach and the elements of
compensation provided to our named executive oﬃcers for 2019.  For 2019, the named executive
oﬃcers were Messrs. Oscar González Rocha, Raúl Jacob, Ramon Leal Chapa, Edgard Corrales and Jorge
Lazalde, and Ms. Lina Vingerhoets (the “Named Executive Oﬃcers”). Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa resigned
from the oﬃce of Senior Vice President eﬀective on July 31, 2019, therefore Mr. Leal’s compensation is
for the time of service with the Company during 2019 until his resignation.
 
This Compensation Discussion and Analysis relates to and should be read together with our Summary
Compensation Table, and other compensation tables, and the information on related party transactions
in this report.
 
Background and Role of Executive Oﬃcers in Determining Compensation:
 
Our Chairman and certain of our other Named Executive Oﬃcers, including Mr. Oscar González Rocha,
assist and advise the Compensation Committee with respect to the compensation of our executive
oﬃcers generally. Messrs. Oscar González Rocha, our President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer; Raúl Jacob,
our Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Oﬃcer; Ramon Leal Chapa, our former Senior Vice
President; Edgard Corrales, our Vice President, Exploration and Jorge Lazalde, our Secretary, and Ms.
Lina Vingerhoets, our Comptroller, do not participate in any discussion relating to their respective
compensations.
 
We are providing, in satisfaction of applicable rules of the SEC, information regarding compensation paid
by us, or by one or more of our subsidiaries or aﬃliates, to our Named Executive Oﬃcers. Mr. Oscar
González Rocha joined us in late 1999 after having an outstanding career at Grupo Mexico and has been
receiving compensation from us since March 2000. Mr. Raúl Jacob held various positions with the
Company since 1992, primarily focused in ﬁnancial planning, corporate ﬁnance, and investor relations
and project evaluation, before being appointed as our Comptroller on October 27, 2011 and our Vice
President, Finance and Chief Financial Oﬃcer on April 18, 2013 after resigning from the Comptroller
oﬃce. Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa held the oﬃce of Senior Vice President of the Company from April 11, 2019
until his resignation eﬀective July 31, 2019. Mr. Corrales has held various positions with the Peruvian
Branch of the Company since 1983. Mr. Lazalde, our Secretary since April 2016, has been a Director,
Executive Vice President and General Counsel of Asarco LLC since December 2009. Since October 2015
he is also General Counsel of Americas Mining Corporation, both subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de
C.V. Lina Vingerhoets has been our Comptroller since April 2016. Previously she was Assistant
Comptroller from April 2015 to April 2016. Ms. Vingerhoets has worked for the Company in various
ﬁnancial, accounting planning, internal control and SEC reporting capacities since 1991.
 
Mr. Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco, our Chairman, is an executive oﬃcer of Grupo Mexico and is
compensated by Grupo Mexico. In 2019, Mr. Larrea has received only fees and stock awards for his
services as member of our Board of Directors. 
 
Compensation Objectives:
 
Our objectives in compensating our Named Executive Oﬃcers are to encourage the achievement of our
business objectives and superior corporate performance by our Named Executive Oﬃcers. Our business
objectives include increasing production and lowering costs in a safe environment, maintaining customer
satisfaction, market leadership, and enhancing stockholder value. The principal objective of our
compensation practices is to reward and retain executives with key core competency critical to our long-
term management strategy. We reward results rather than on the basis of seniority, tenure or other
entitlement. We believe that our executive compensation practices align compensation with our
business values and strategy.
 
 
9
 
 
What Is Our Compensation Designed to Reward?
 
Our compensation is designed to reward our Named Executive Oﬃcers for their eﬀorts and dedication to
us and for their ability to attract, motivate, and energize a high-performance leadership team,
encouraging innovation in our employees, conceptualizing key trends, evaluating strategic decisions,
and continuously challenging our employees to sharpen their vision and excel in performing their duties.
We also reward our Named Executive Oﬃcers for achieving the business plans that the Board of
Directors has approved, for unique accomplishments and achievements, and for their leadership in
managing our aﬀairs in the locations in which we operate, mainly Peru and Mexico.
 
Why We Choose to Compensate Our Executives?
 
We choose to compensate our employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers, to grant them basic
economic security at levels consistent with competitive local practices. We believe that the
compensation we provide to our employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers, permits us to
retain our highly skilled and qualiﬁed workforce.
 
We are required to grant our employees certain elements of compensation mandated by Peruvian and
Mexican law, as applicable. Peruvian and Mexican law require us to pay salaries to our employees
commensurate with each employee’s job requirements and the experience and skills of every employee.
The level of each salary is determined by us. We pay salaries and bonuses to reward and retain our
excellent employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers. We also provide other Company
sponsored beneﬁts to remain competitive in the Peruvian and Mexican labor markets and to reward our
employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers. The Peruvian ﬁve percent increase in monthly
salary for each ﬁve years of service evolved as a beneﬁt bargained by our labor unions and was later
extended to all salaried employees. The Peruvian vacation bonus and vacation travel beneﬁts evolved
from our practice of compensating expatriate employees who worked in Peru and was later extended to
certain key salaried employees, including Named Executive Oﬃcers working in Peru.
 
How Do We Determine Each Element of Compensation?
 
The Company’s management team and Compensation Committee make the decisions to grant salary
increases and bonuses for the Named Executive Oﬃcers of the Company after a thorough analysis of
numerous factors, including among others, the responsibilities and performance of each Named
Executive Oﬃcer measured in the areas of production, safety and environmental responsiveness (both
individually and as compared to other oﬃcers of the Company). In addition, management and the
Compensation Committee consider years of service, future challenges and objectives, the potential
contributions of each oﬃcer to the future success of our Company, total executive compensation, and
the Company’s overall ﬁnancial performance. Peruvian and Mexican law requires us to pay salaries to
our employees commensurate with each employee’s job requirements, experience and skills, and to
share 8% of the annual pre-income tax proﬁts of our Peruvian Branch with our Peruvian employees and
10% of the annual pre-income tax proﬁts of our Mexican operation with our Mexican employees.
 
When we increase base salaries for our Named Executive Oﬃcers, we use a tabulation, which is revised
every year to adjust for inﬂation in Mexico and Peru. The base salary increases take into account the
individual’s position, as well as his/her results and job performance in the relevant year. Base salary
increases are not granted indiscriminately to employees. Instead, they are granted to reward individuals
who facilitate the achievement of the Company’s corporate goals. Our corporate goals include
increasing production and lowering costs in a safe environment, maintaining customer satisfaction and
market leadership, and enhancing stockholder value.
 
We promote our Named Executive Oﬃcers from within our organization and we hire new executives
through recruiters. We also use Human Resources consultants, such as the Hay Group from time to time,
which provide us with comparative salary data for the sought position extracted from their database
relating to comparable companies in Mexico and Peru. The information provided from time to time by
the Human Resources consultants is not customized for the Company. Although our Compensation
Committee has the authority and necessary funding to engage compensation and other advisers, it has
not engaged such advisers in the period 2016-2019.
 
 
10
 
 
The salaries provided by the Human Resources consultants from their database are used by us as an
indication of the market salaries prevailing in Peru and Mexico. In Peru, the consultants provide us with
salaries, which they report were paid or oﬀered to potential candidates by mining companies operating
in Peru. The reports of the Human Resources consultants have included in the past salary information
from Peruvian companies or Peruvian subsidiaries, such as the following: Xstrata Tintaya, S.A., Minera
Yanacocha Peru, Hochschild Mining, plc, Compañía Minera Antamina, S.A., Minera Barrick Misquichilca,
S.A., Minsur S.A., Gold Fields La Cima, S.A.A., and Sociedad Minera Cerro Verde, S.A.A. In Mexico, the
consultants have provided us with salaries, which they reported were paid or oﬀered to potential
candidates by mining companies operating in Mexico. The reports of the Human Resources consultants
have included in the past salary information  from Mexican companies or Mexican subsidiaries, such as
the following: Newmont Mining Corporation, Pan American Silver Corporation, Industrias Peñoles, S.A.B.
de C.V., Grupo Bacis, S.A. de C.V., Mexicoro, S.A. de C.V., Minera BHP Billiton, S.A. de C.V., and Minera
Phelps Dodge de Mexico S. de R.L. de C.V. The above listing is for illustration purposes only, as the list of
companies used by Human Resources consultants may vary from year to year. Additionally, we have not
made an independent veriﬁcation of the salary information reported by the Human Resources
consultants.
 
We factor this comparative salary information into our decision making process by targeting our
personnel compensation policies, including the compensation of the Named Executive Oﬃcers, generally
toward the median and third quartile of market compensation.
 
In 2017 and 2018, the reported median base salaries for S&P 500 chief executives were $1,150,000 and
$1,200,000, respectively. Although the 2019 report was not available at the time of print, we believe
that the median base salary for 2019 would continue the same trend as last year. Even though we are
not one of the constituent companies of the S&P 500 index, we have a market capitalization that would
permit us to compare ourselves with the companies that constitute the index. We have compared the
2017 and 2018 salaries of Mr. Oscar González Rocha with the reported median base salaries of S&P 500
chief executives and determined that the salaries paid to him are below the reported median. Similarly,
we believe that the salary of Mr. Oscar González Rocha in 2019 will be below the reported median for
2019.
 
The amount and formula applicable to the other beneﬁts are mandated by Peruvian and Mexican law for
all salaried employees. We also sponsor programs to recruit and retain qualiﬁed employees working in
Peru and Mexico. 
 
Under Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, we may not deduct, with
certain exceptions, compensation in excess of $1 million to the Principal Executive Oﬃcer, the Principal
Financial Oﬃcer and our three other most highly compensated oﬃcers (other than the Principal
Executive Oﬃcer or the Principal Financial Oﬃcer) as required to be reported in our proxy statement. We
do not believe that Section 162(m) will have any immediate material impact on us because, among
other things, our oﬃcers’ salaries do not enter into the calculation of US source taxable income. We will,
however, continue to monitor our executive compensation programs to ensure their eﬀectiveness and
eﬃciency in light of our needs, including Section 162(m).
 
How Does Each Element and Our Decisions Regarding That Element Fit Into Our Overall
Compensation Objectives and Aﬀect Decisions Regarding Other Elements?
 
We take into account each element of compensation to determine the overall compensation of our
executives. It is our practice to grant relatively small salary increases commensurate with the cost of
living increases in Peru and Mexico and tailor the amount of the incentive cash payments to balance the
amounts of compensation mandated by Peruvian and Mexican law, principally the amounts received as
proﬁt participations. In years in which the proﬁt participation is high, the bonus or incentive cash
payment will be reduced. In years in which the proﬁt participation is relatively modest, if our ﬁnancial
conditions permit, we tend to increase the amount paid in cash incentives. The payment of bonuses is
discretionary and we do not necessarily pay bonuses every year. The payment of bonuses and the
amount of any such bonuses depend, among other things, on our ﬁnancial performance, our intensive
capital investment plan, our projected future cash ﬂow generation from operations, and our liquidity in
general. We do not provide compensation tied to speciﬁc pre-determined individual or Company
performance criteria or long-term incentive compensation. The discretionary cash bonus payments
granted to our executives and non-executive employees are not based on pre-established performance
targets or on targets that have been previously communicated to the executives or the employees. The
granting of speciﬁc awards and the amount of each award are discretionary and substantially uncertain
until we decide to award them. Without limiting this, from time to time, larger discretionary cash
bonuses are granted to certain of our Named Executive Oﬃcers in recognition of said Named Executive
Oﬃcers' performance during the year and to reward them for their leadership, vision and focus.
 
 
11
 
 
Disclosure on Result of the Non-Binding Advisory Vote on Executive Compensation (“Say-on-
Pay”):
 
Every year we provide our Common Stockholders with the opportunity to cast an advisory vote on
executive compensation. At our annual meeting of stockholders held on April 25, 2019, 99.60% of the
votes cast on said proposal were voted in favor of the proposal. Our Compensation Committee and
management team believe this aﬃrms our Common Stockholders’ support of our approach to executive
compensation, therefore no material changes were made to our approach. We will continue to consider
the outcome of future advisory votes on executive compensation when making future compensation
decisions for the Named Executive Oﬃcers.  In addition, a substantial majority of the votes cast on the
Say-on-Pay frequency vote proposal in 2017 were in favor of holding a Say-on-Pay vote every year, and
as a result, we will continue to hold this vote on an annual basis.
 
Summary:
 
Our compensation practices are designed to comply with the requirements of Peruvian and Mexican law
and with our goals and objectives to retain our key executives and reward them appropriately for their
positive results. We continue to monitor our compensation practices to remain competitive in the
marketplace and to reward our executives for results that are consistent with the long-term interest of
our Company and our stockholders.
 
 Peruvian Compensation Practices:
 
Our Peruvian compensation practices take into account many factors, including individual performance
and responsibilities, years of service, elements of compensation mandated by Peruvian law, future
challenges and objectives, contributions to the future success of our Company, the executive’s total
compensation, and our ﬁnancial performance. We may also look at the compensation levels of
comparable companies. 
 
Our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Peru, Messrs. Oscar González Rocha, Raul Jacob and Edgard Corrales,
and Ms. Lina Vingerhoets received cash-based compensation, which is currently paid. The cash-based
compensation has two principal components: base salary and bonus, which are discretionary, and
compensation mandated by Peruvian law. We also sponsor programs to recruit and retain qualiﬁed
employees working in Peru. Additionally, Grupo Mexico oﬀers certain key employees, including our
Named Executive Oﬃcers, eligibility under stock purchase plans. See the description of these plans
under “Stock Purchase Plans of Grupo Mexico” below.
 
The payment of bonuses to our Named Executive Oﬃcers is discretionary and we do not necessarily pay
bonuses every year. The payment of bonuses and the amount of same depend, among other things, on
our ﬁnancial performance, our intensive capital investment plan, our future cash ﬂow generation from
operations, and our liquidity in general.
 
We do not provide compensation tied to speciﬁc pre-determined individual or Company performance
criteria or long-term incentive compensation.
 
The cash incentive payments granted to our Named Executive Oﬃcers are not based on pre-established
performance targets or on targets that have been previously communicated to the executives. The
granting of the award and the amount of each award are discretionary and substantially uncertain until
we decide to award them.
 
All our Peruvian employee compensation is denominated in Peruvian Soles. We convert the Peruvian
Soles into U.S. dollars using the average exchange rate for the applicable period.
 
Stock Options:
 
We have not granted stock options or other equity incentive awards to any of our Named Executive
Oﬃcers since 2000 in Peru. The Stock Incentive Plan, under which options and stock awards could have
been granted, expired by its terms on January 1, 2006.
 
 
12
 
 
Stock Purchase Plans of Grupo Mexico:
 
Grupo Mexico oﬀers certain eligible key employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers, a stock
purchase plan (the “Employee Stock Purchase Plan”) through a trust that acquires shares of Grupo
Mexico for future sales to our employees, and employees of our subsidiaries and certain aﬃliated
companies. Sales are at the approximate fair market value at the date of grant. Every two years
employees will be able to purchase shares subscribed for purchase in the previous two years. The
employees will pay for shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over the eight year period
of the plan. At the end of the eight year period, Grupo Mexico will grant the participant a bonus of one
share for every ten shares purchased by the employee. If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during
the eight year period, the participant will be entitled to receive the dividend in cash for all shares that
have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the participant has only
partially paid for shares, the dividends payable with respect to the purchased shares will be used to
reduce the remaining liability owed for such shares. No stock bonuses under the Employee Stock
Purchase Plan were granted to our Named Executive Oﬃcers in 2019.
 
Grupo Mexico also oﬀers a stock purchase plan for certain members of its executive management and
the executive management of its subsidiaries and certain aﬃliated companies (“Executive Stock
Purchase Plan”). Under this plan, participants receive incentive cash bonuses that are used to purchase
shares of Grupo Mexico and which are deposited in a trust.  Mr. Oscar González Rocha received a
discretionary cash bonus of $416,948 in 2019, which was used to purchase shares under this plan.  This
bonus is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the Bonus column.
 
Pension Plan:
 
The Company has two non-contributory deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans covering former salaried
employees in the United States and certain former employees in Peru. Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob,
and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets are not covered by our non-contributory retirement plans. They are
covered by the Peruvian private pension system (“AFP”), a mandatory pension system. As required by
Peruvian law, we retain every month a percentage of their salary and deposit the amount into their
individual AFP accounts. The percentage of the monthly salary retained and deposited varies each year
and has ranged from 8% to 10% over the years. Employees received in 1995 a 13.53% salary increase
to compensate them for the new deduction established by Peruvian law to participate in the mandatory
pension system. Messrs. Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets received a payment of $6,159, $2,290
and $2, 098, respectively, in 2019 pursuant to the requirements of the AFP law. These payments are
included in the compensation reported for Messrs. Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets. 
 
Severance Beneﬁts:
 
We do not have corporate plans providing severance beneﬁts to our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Peru.
Our Named Executive Oﬃcers only receive severance beneﬁts provided by Peruvian law. If the employee
is terminated by us and he or she has a ﬁxed-term employment agreement, Peruvian law requires that
we pay the employee’s salary for the remaining of the term of his or her employment agreement.
Peruvian law also provides that if the employee has been dismissed without cause, he or she is entitled
to an amount equal to one and one-half times his or her monthly salary for each year of service up to a
maximum of eight years or the equivalent of twelve months of salary. Peruvian law also provides that at
the termination of employment, an employee will be able to withdraw the full amount of the
compensation for the years of service, known as CTS (“Compensación por Tiempo de Servicios”) in Peru
described below. Our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Peru do not have change of control employment
agreements. Our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Peru, including Messrs. Jacob and Corrales and Ms.
Vingerhoets, do not have employment agreements. However, Mr. Oscar González Rocha, our Chief
Executive Oﬃcer, who is an expatriate, has an employment agreement described below.
 
Expatriate Employees:
 
Pursuant to Peruvian laws concerning expatriate employees, Mr. Oscar González Rocha entered into an
employment agreement. The employment agreement is in eﬀect for a term of one year and may be
extended for additional periods. In accordance with the terms of the employment agreement, the
Company has agreed to provide Mr. Oscar González Rocha (and any other expatriate employees) with
beneﬁts as required by Peruvian law. Under the employment agreement, Mr. Oscar González Rocha may
resign at any time by providing us with 30 days notice. The employment agreement also provides that
we may dismiss Mr. Oscar González Rocha for serious oﬀenses as established by Peruvian law.
Terminated employees are also entitled to receive severance beneﬁts as required by Peruvian law. Our
non-Peruvian contract employees and their dependents receive travel beneﬁts to return to their home
country at the end of each year and return to Peru at the commencement of each year of the contract.
Additionally, this beneﬁt includes travel to their home country at the termination of the contract.
 
Discretionary Cash Compensation:
 
(a) Base Salary:
 
Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets received, $490,371, $145,869
$134,865 and $96,345 in 2019 as annual salary, respectively.
 
None of the Peruvian Named Executive Oﬃcers received salary increases in 2019. The minor diﬀerences
in the comparison of the 2019 and 2018 salaries for Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms.
Vingerhoets are due to foreign exchange conversion rates. The Company's functional currency is the
U.S. dollar and salaries, as are all signiﬁcant portions of our Peruvian operating costs, are denominated
in Peruvian Soles. Accordingly, when inﬂation and currency devaluation/appreciation of the Peruvian
currency occur reported salaries can be aﬀected. Mr. Oscar González Rocha’s base salary at the
commencement of his services with us is reﬂected in an employment agreement mandated by Peruvian
law. In general, the base salaries of our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Peru follow the guidelines of
salaries of other key employees of the Company.
 
13
 
 
(b) Bonus:
 
Mr. Oscar González Rocha received a discretionary cash bonus of $416,948 in 2019 in recognition of his
performance and to reward him for his leadership, vision and focus. This discretionary cash bonus is the
bonus paid under the Executive Stock Purchase Plan. Messrs. Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets did
not receive discretionary cash incentive bonuses in 2019. The amount of the discretionary cash bonus of
Mr. Oscar González Rocha is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the Bonus column.
 
Peruvian Mandated Cash Compensation:
 
(a) Proﬁt Sharing in the Proﬁts of Our Peruvian Branch:
 
Peruvian law requires that we, as well as all other mining companies in Peru, share 8% of the annual pre-
income tax proﬁts of our Branch with all our workers (salaried and non-salaried). This beneﬁt is payable
in cash to each employee in an amount not to exceed 18 times his or her monthly salary. The excess is
paid to a Peruvian pro-employment fund and to the regional governments where we operate, that is to
say, the regional governments of Lima, Arequipa, Moquegua, and Tacna in Peru.
 
Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets received $170,037, $62,816, $61,386,
and $43,809, respectively, in 2019 as participants in the pre-tax earnings of our Peruvian Branch,
respectively. These amounts are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other
Compensation column.
 
(b) Peruvian Legal Holiday and Other Bonuses:
 
Peruvian law also requires payment each year of one month’s salary to each employee as a bonus for
Peruvian Independence holidays and Christmas.  Peruvian law requires the payment of six days’ salary
to every employee, including Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets, every
year in which May 1 falls on a Sunday or ﬁve days’ salary if it falls on a weekday (“Labor Day Bonus”).
Peruvian law also requires the payment of a bonus to each salaried and non-salaried employee,
including Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets for the celebration of Miners'
Day. Said compensation is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other
Compensation column.
 
In 2019, Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets received, $107,203, $35,622
$34,733 and $23,138 as Peruvian Independence holidays, Christmas and Labor Day bonuses,
respectively. Additionally, they also received the bonus to celebrate Miners' Day. These amounts are
reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
 
14
 
 
(c) Termination of Employment Compensation or CTS:
 
Additionally, as compensation for years of service or CTS, Peruvian law requires a deposit of one twelfth
of an employee’s annual salary, vacation, travel, Independence holidays, Christmas, dependents and
service award bonus, each year, for each employee (whether Peruvian or expatriate) working in Peru, as
applicable. This amount is deposited in a local bank of the employee’s choosing, in an individual
account, which accrues interest paid by said bank. For all legal purposes, the chosen bank acts as
trustee of the deposited amounts. The CTS funds can only be fully withdrawn when the employee
terminates employment.
 
In 2019, we deposited for Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and for Ms. Vingerhoets, $99,286,
$19,198, $18,936 and $12,478, respectively, as CTS compensation. For further details on the Peruvian
mandated severance beneﬁts see above under “Severance Beneﬁts.” These amounts are reﬂected in
the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(d) Peruvian Mandated Company Housing:
 
Peruvian mining law requires that we provide residences at our operations in Toquepala, Cuajone, and Ilo
for all our salaried and non-salaried employees, including for Mr. Oscar González Rocha. No other
Peruvian Named Executive Oﬃcer enjoys this beneﬁt.
 
(e) Peruvian Mandated Family Assistance:
 
Peruvian law requires that we provide family assistance, which consists of 10% of the legal minimum
salary, to all our salaried and non-salaried employees, including Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and
Corrales, who are married or have children under the age of 18. Said compensation is reﬂected in the
Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column. No other Peruvian Named
Executive Oﬃcer enjoys this beneﬁt.
 
Cash Compensation under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
(a) Vacation Compensation:
 
We provide vacation bonuses for all our salaried employees and payment for vacation travel to all our
key salaried employees.
 
Mr. González Rocha’s vacation bonus and travel in 2019 amounted to $43,320 and is reﬂected in the
Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column. In 2019, Messrs. Jacob and
Corrales received, $14,729 and $13,490, as vacation bonus and travel, respectively. Ms. Vingerhoets
also received vacation and travel compensation. These amounts are reﬂected in the Summary
Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(b) Five Percent Beneﬁt or “Quinquenio”:
 
We also provide voluntarily to all salaried employees and to non-salaried employees under agreement
with our local labor unions, a beneﬁt consisting of ﬁve percent of the monthly salary for each period of
ﬁve years of service. We call this beneﬁt, colloquially in Peru, the “quinquenio.”
 
In 2019, Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets received, $73,556, $36,467,
$47,203 and $24,086 as quinquenio, respectively. These amounts are reﬂected in the Summary
Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
 
15
 
  
(c) Other Company Sponsored Programs:
 
We provide a small family assistance subsidy mandated by Peruvian law to expatriate employees and
certain executives. In 2019, Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales received minor subsidies under
this program which are reﬂected in the All Other Compensation column in the Summary Compensation
Table.  Additionally, said column reﬂects modest Christmas gifts given to all salaried and non-salaried
employees, including Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales and Ms. Vingerhoets.
  
Other Beneﬁts:
 
(a) Company Housing, Medical Beneﬁts and Club Membership:
 
We provide a corporate residence in Lima, which Mr. Oscar González Rocha uses when he conducts
business activities at our Lima headquarters, and we pay for his business club membership in Lima,
Peru. We reﬂect $34,800 for the housing beneﬁt and small fees for medical beneﬁts and a club
membership in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(b) Company Provided Car and Driver:
 
Messrs.  González Rocha, Jacob and Corrales, Ms. Vingerhoets and other key salaried employees are
provided with a Company car and a driver. We consider that the use of Company cars by
Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob, Corrales, Ms. Vingerhoets and by other key salaried employees is not a
personal beneﬁt, but is integrally and directly related to the performance of their functions as key
executives or salaried employees of one of the largest companies in Peru, is required for security
reasons, and is consistent with local practice.
 
(c) Tax Gross-Up:
 
We provide certain key employees a cash beneﬁt as reimbursement for the payment of taxes on
compensation received under the Stock Purchase Plans of Grupo Mexico.  In 2019, Mr. Oscar González
Rocha received $178,692 as a tax gross-up payment, which is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation
Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(d) Aﬃliate Directors' Fees:
 
Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob, and Corrales each received $20,000 in 2019 for services as directors of
Coimolache S.A. ("Coimolache"), respectively, which is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table
under the All Other Compensation column. The Company has a 44.2% participation in Coimolache.
 
Mexican Compensation Practices:
 
Our Mexican compensation practices also take into account many factors, including individual
performance and responsibilities, years of service, elements of compensation mandated by Mexican law,
future challenges and objectives, contributions to the future success of our Company, the executive total
compensation, and our ﬁnancial performance. We may also look at the compensation levels of
comparable companies, as described above.
 
Our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Mexico, Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Jorge Lazalde receive cash-
based compensation, which is currently paid. The cash-based compensation has two principal
components: base salary and bonus, which are discretionary, and compensation mandated by Mexican
law. We also sponsor programs to recruit and retain qualiﬁed employees working in Mexico. Additionally,
Grupo Mexico oﬀers certain key employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers, eligibility under
stock purchase plans. See the description of these plans under “Stock Purchase Plans of Grupo Mexico”
below. Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa resigned eﬀective July 31, 2019 from the oﬃce of Senior Vice President.
 
The payment of bonuses to our Named Executive Oﬃcers is discretionary and we do not necessarily pay
bonuses every year. The payment of bonuses and the amount of the same depend on numerous factors,
including among others, our ﬁnancial performance, our intensive capital investment plan, our future
cash ﬂow generation from operations, and our liquidity in general.
 
 
16
 
 
We do not provide compensation tied to speciﬁc pre-determined individual or Company performance
criteria or long-term incentive compensation.
 
The cash incentive payments granted to our Named Executive Oﬃcers are not based on pre-established
performance targets or targets that have been previously communicated to the executives. The granting
of the award and the amount of each award are discretionary and substantially uncertain until we decide
to award them.
 
All our Mexican employee compensation is denominated in Mexican Pesos. We convert the Mexican
Pesos into U.S. dollars using the average exchange rate for the applicable period.
 
Stock Options:
 
We have not granted stock options or other equity incentive awards to any of our Named Executive
Oﬃcers since 2000 in Mexico. The Stock Incentive Plan, under which options and stock awards could
have been granted, expired by its terms on January 1, 2006.
 
Stock Purchase Plans of Grupo Mexico:
 
Grupo Mexico oﬀers certain eligible key employees, including our Named Executive Oﬃcers, the
Employee Stock Purchase Plan through a trust that acquires shares of Grupo Mexico for future sales to
our employees, and employees of our subsidiaries and certain aﬃliated companies. Sales are at the
approximate fair market value on the date of grant. Every two years employees will be able to purchase
shares subscribed for purchase in the previous two years. The employees will pay for shares purchased
through monthly payroll deductions over the eight year period of the plan. At the end of the eight year
period, Grupo Mexico will grant the participant a bonus of one share for every ten shares purchased by
the employee. If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight year period, the participant will
be entitled to receive the dividend in cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of
the date that the dividend is paid. If the participant has only partially paid for shares, the dividends
payable with respect to purchased shares will be used to reduce the remaining liability owed for such
shares. No stock bonuses under the Employee Stock Purchase Plan were granted to our Named
Executive Oﬃcers in 2019.
 
Under the Executive Stock Purchase Plan, participants receive incentive cash bonuses which are used to
purchase shares of Grupo Mexico and which are deposited in a trust. Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and
Lazalde did not receive discretionary cash bonuses under the Executive Stock Purchase Plan in 2019.
 
Pension Plan:
 
Retirement beneﬁts of our employees in Mexico are covered by the Mexican social security system
mandated by Mexican law. In addition, certain of our Mexican subsidiaries participate in a deﬁned
contribution pension plan, which complements the retirement beneﬁts granted under the Mexican social
security system.
 
 
Under the Mexican pension plan, non-union employees of Minera México, S.A. de C.V., and participating
subsidiaries who have completed ten continuous years of employment with the participating subsidiary,
including Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde earn the right to receive certain beneﬁts upon
retirement at the normal retirement age of 70 or upon early retirement on or after age 60. Messrs.
Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde received a contribution under the Mexican pension plan. These amounts
are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column. An
employee may choose to retire at age 75 only upon receiving the proper consent of the participating
company.
 
 
17
 
 
Employees contribute 3% of their monthly base salary to the plan and the employer matches the
employees’ contributions with an additional 3%. The funds are then invested in treasury or in
marketable securities. The ﬁduciary of such investment funds is an institution authorized by the Mexican
government. The plan is administered by a technical committee composed of at least three unpaid
individuals (who may be employees of the participating companies), which are appointed by the
Company. The plan may be amended or terminated at any time at the Company’s discretion, but such
amendment or termination must preserve acquired rights of the employees.
 
Regardless of the manner in which an employee’s employment is terminated, he/she is entitled to
receive his/her employee contributions and any amounts earned during his/her term of employment.
Any severance beneﬁts received by the terminated employee will be deducted from any employer
contribution to be received under the plan. In the event of the retirement of an employee, he/she is
entitled to receive amounts accrued under the plan.
 
Severance Beneﬁts:
 
We do not have corporate plans providing severance beneﬁts to our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Mexico.
Our Named Executive Oﬃcers only receive severance beneﬁts provided by Mexican law or negotiated by
us when we undertake workforce reductions at our operations. Our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Mexico
do not have change of control or employment agreements.
 
Discretionary Cash Compensation:
 
(a) Base Salary:
 
Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde received $114,667 and $180,000, respectively, as base salary in
2019. Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa resigned from the oﬃce of Senior Vice President eﬀective on July 31, 2019.
The base salary of Mr. Lazalde decreased slightly from 2018 to 2019 due to foreign exchange
conversions.
 
(b) Bonus:
        
Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde did not receive discretionary cash bonuses under the Executive
Stock Purchase Plan in 2019. Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa received a discretionary cash incentive bonus in
2019 of $88,249. Mr. Lazalde received $22,500 as discretionary cash incentive bonus in 2019. These
bonuses are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the Bonus column. 
  
Mexican Mandated Cash Compensation:
 
(a) Proﬁt Sharing in the Proﬁts of Our Mexican Operations:
 
Mexican law requires us, as well as all other mining companies in Mexico, to share 10% of the annual
pre-tax proﬁts of our operations with all our workers (salaried and non-salaried). This beneﬁt is payable
in cash to each employee. Mr. Leal Chapa did not receive a proﬁt participation in 2019. Mr. Lazalde
received $28,040 as participation in the pre-income tax earnings of our Mexican operations. This amount
is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(b) Mexican Christmas Bonus:
 
Mexican law also requires payment each year of at least 15 days salary to each employee, with at least
one completed year of service, as a bonus for Christmas. We give our employees in Mexico one month’s
salary as Christmas bonus. Mr. Lazalde received $15,000 as a Christmas bonus in 2019. Mr. Leal Chapa
also received a Christmas bonus in 2019. These amounts are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation
Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(c) Vacation Compensation:
 
We provide vacation bonuses for all our salaried employees, with at least one completed year of service,
including our Named Executive Oﬃcers in Mexico, as required by Mexican law. This vacation bonus
consists of at least 25% of the salary earned during the vacation period. Mr. Lazalde received a vacation
bonus of $15,000 in 2019. Mr. Leal Chapa also received a vacation bonus in 2019. These amounts are
reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.  
 
 
18
 
 
Cash Compensation under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
(a) Mexican Pension Plan:
 
We oﬀer our employees of Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. and participating subsidiaries the possibility of
joining a deﬁned contribution pension plan. Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde received beneﬁts as
employer contributions under our Mexican pension plan in 2019. We reﬂect these beneﬁts in the
Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column. A more detailed description of
the principal features of the Mexican pension plan can be found under “Pension Plan” above.
 
(b) Mexican Savings Plans:
 
We oﬀer our employees the possibility of saving up to 13% of their salaries and we match this amount
with our own contributions (but never in excess of ten times the minimum monthly salary). These
amounts are invested by us in marketable securities. Amounts can be withdrawn at any time with proper
notice after ceasing participation in the plan. Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde received
contributions under our Mexican savings plan, which are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table
under the All Other Compensation column.
 
Other Company Provided Beneﬁts:
 
 (a)Medical Insurance and Other Beneﬁts:
 
Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa and Lazalde receive minor contributions for medical insurance beneﬁts and
food vouchers. These amounts are reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other
Compensation column.
  
(b) Company Provided Car and Driver:
 
Mr. Lazalde and other key salaried employees are provided with a Company car and a driver. Mr. Ramon
Leal Chapa was granted a car and driver until his resignation eﬀective on July 31, 2019. We consider that
the use of Company cars by Messrs. Ramon Leal Chapa, Lazalde and other key salaried employees is not
a personal beneﬁt but is integrally and directly related to the performance of their functions as key
executives or salaried employees of one of the largest companies in Mexico, is required for security
reasons and is consistent with local practice.
 
(c) Corporate Secretary Fees:
 
Mr. Lazalde received $32,000 in fees as our corporate Secretary in 2019. This amount is reﬂected in the
Summary Compensation Table under the All Other Compensation column.
 
(d) Termination of Service Payment:
 
Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa received a payment of $80,586 as compensation for his termination of service
with the Company. This amount is reﬂected in the Summary Compensation Table under the All Other
Compensation column.
 
Executive Compensation:
 
Set forth below is certain information concerning the compensation earned by, awarded to, paid by us,
or by one or more of our subsidiaries or aﬃliates, to Messrs. González Rocha, Jacob, Corrales and
Lazalde and to Ms. Vingerhoets for services rendered in all capacities to us for the ﬁscal years ended
December 31, 2019, December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017. The compensation of Mr. Ramon Leal
Chapa is for the time of service with the Company during 2019 until his resignation eﬀective July 31,
2019. Mr. Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco, our Chairman, received no compensation from us in 2019, 2018
and 2017 for services other than as a director.
  
19
 
 
  
Summary Compensation Table(a)
 
Gross Annual Compensation
  
Name and  Principal Position Year Salary  Bonus(b) All Other
Compensation
(c)  Total
Oscar González Rocha President
and CEO 2019 $490,371  $416,948  $732,551  $1,639,870
 2018 $489,651  $395,676  $619,437  $1,504,764
 2017 $487,157  $160,627  $589,718  $1,237,502
Raúl Jacob Vice President
Finance and CFO 2019 $145,869  $_____  $197,454  $343,323
 2018 $151,163  $23,496  $183,718  $358,377
 2017 $146,230  $11,329  $181,818  $339,377
Ramon Leal Chapa Former
Senior Vice President  2019 $114,667  $ 88,249  $ 108,589  $ 311, 505
Edgard Corrales Vice President,
Exploration 2019 $134,865  $_____  $199,155  $334,020
 2018 $140,123  $16,945  $183,599  $340,667
 2017 $138,212  $11,188  $175,075  $324,475
Julian Jorge Lazalde Secretary 2019 $180,000  $22,500  $100,699  $303,199
 2018 $182,451  $29,629  $89,094  $301,174
 2017 $175,286  $40,103  $79,598  $294,987
Lina Vingerhoets Comptroller 2019 $96,345   ____  $115,756  $212,101
 2018 $96,983   7,686  $105,250  $209,919
 2017 $96,038   ____  $97,026  $193,064
 
 (a)Compensation for all of our Peruvian and Mexican employees is denominated, respectively, in
Peruvian Soles and Mexican Pesos. We convert the Peruvian Soles and Mexican Pesos into U.S.
dollars using the average exchange rate for the applicable period. The average rate in 2019 for
Peruvian Soles was 3.338 Soles for each U.S. dollar. The average rate in 2019 for Mexican Pesos
was 19.2617 Mexican Pesos for each U.S. dollar.
 
 (b)The 2019 cash bonus of Mr. Oscar González Rocha reﬂects amounts paid under the Executive Stock
Purchase Plan.
 
 (c)All Other Compensation for Mr. Oscar González Rocha consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Peruvian Law:
 
  ·$170,037 in 2019 as proﬁt sharing in the proﬁts of our Peruvian Branch;
 
  ·$107,203 in 2019 as Peruvian legal holiday and Labor Day bonuses;
 
  ·$99,286 in 2019 as termination of employment or CTS;
 
  ·Family assistance; and
 
  ·Miners' bonus.
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·$43,320 as a vacation bonus and travel in 2019;
 
  ·$73,556 in 2019 as ﬁve percent beneﬁt or Quinquenio; and
 
  ·Compensation under other Company sponsored programs, consisting of other minor
Christmas gifts.
 
(iii) Other Beneﬁts:
 
  ·$34,800 for the use of our corporate Lima residence and small fees for payment of
medical beneﬁts and a business club membership in 2019; and
 
  ·$178,692 in 2019 as a tax gross-up payment.
 
 
20
 
 
(iv) Aﬃliate Director's Fees:
 
  ·$20,000 in 2019 as director's fees for services in Coimolache. The Company has a 44.2%
participation in Coimolache.
 
All Other Compensation for Mr. Raúl Jacob consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Peruvian Law:
 
  ·$62,816 in 2019 as proﬁt sharing in the proﬁts of our Peruvian Branch;
 
  ·$35,622 in 2019 as Peruvian legal holiday and Labor Day bonuses;
 
  ·$19,198 in 2019 as termination of employment or CTS;
 
  ·Family assistance; and
 
  ·Miners' bonus.
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·$14,792 in 2019 as vacation bonus and travel;
 
  ·$36,467 in 2019 as ﬁve percent beneﬁt or Quinquenio;
 
  ·Subsidy to assist with education costs for his children in 2019; and
 
  ·Compensation under other Company sponsored programs, consisting of minor Christmas
gifts.
 
(iii) Aﬃliate Director's Fees:
 
  ·$20,000 in 2019 as director's fees for services in Coimolache. The Company has a 44.2%
participation in Coimolache.
 
All Other Compensation for Mr. Ramon Leal Chapa consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Mexican Law:
 
  ·A Mexican vacation bonus in 2019; and
 
  ·A Mexican Christmas bonus in 2019.
 
 
21
 
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·2019 contributions under our Mexican pension and health plans;
 
  ·2019 contributions under our Mexican savings plan;
 
  ·Compensation under other Company programs, consisting of food vouchers; and
 
  ·Termination of service payment in 2019 of $80,586.
 
All Other Compensation for Mr. Edgard Corrales consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Peruvian Law:
 
  ·$61,386 in 2019 as proﬁt sharing in the proﬁts of our Peruvian Branch;
 
  ·$34,733 in 2019 as Peruvian legal holiday and Labor Day bonuses;
 
  ·$18,936 in 2019 as termination of employment or CTS;
    
  ·Family assistance; and
 
  ·Miners' bonus.
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·$13,490 in 2019 as vacation bonus and travel;
 
  ·$47,203 in 2019 as ﬁve percent beneﬁt or Quinquenio;
 
  ·Subsidy in 2019 to assist with education costs for his children; and
 
  ·Compensation under other Company sponsored programs, consisting of other minor
Christmas gifts.
 
(iii) Aﬃliate Director's Fees:
 
  ·$20,000 in 2019 as director's fees for services in Coimolache. The Company has a 44.2%
participation in Coimolache.
 
All Other Compensation for Mr. Jorge Lazalde consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Mexican Law:
 
  ·Mexican Christmas bonus of $15,000 in 2019;
 
  ·Mexican vacation bonus of $15,000 in 2019; and
 
  ·$28,040 in 2019 as proﬁt participation.
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·2019 contributions under our Mexican pension and health plans;
 
  ·2019 contributions under our Mexican savings plan; and
 
  ·Compensation under other Company programs, consisting of food vouchers.
 
 
22
 
 
(iii) Attendance Fees as Corporate Secretary:
 
  ·$32,000 in fees as our corporate Secretary in 2019.
 
All Other Compensation for Ms. Vingerhoets consists mainly of:
 
(i) Cash Compensation Mandated by Peruvian Law:
 
  ·$43,809 in 2019 as proﬁt sharing in the proﬁts of our Peruvian Branch;
 
  ·$23,138 in 2019 as Peruvian legal holiday and Labor Day bonuses;
 
  ·$12,478 in 2019 as termination of employment or CTS; and
 
  ·Miners' bonus.
 
(ii) Cash Compensation Under Company Sponsored Programs:
 
  ·Vacation bonus and travel compensation in 2019;
 
  ·$24,086 in 2019 as ﬁve percent beneﬁt or Quinquenio; and
 
  ·Compensation under other Company sponsored programs, consisting of other minor
Christmas gifts.
  
Outstanding Equity Awards at Fiscal Year-End
 
No options to purchase shares in the Company or other equity incentive awards have been granted
since 2000.  No options, equity awards or equity-based awards were outstanding at December 31,
2019.  The Stock Incentive Plan, under which options and stock awards could have been granted,
expired by its terms on January 1, 2006.
 
Option Exercises and Stock Vested at Fiscal Year-End
 
No options were exercised since 2000.  No stock award vested as of December 31, 2019.
 
Retirement Plans
 
See descriptions above under “Pension Plans.”
 
 
23
 
 
Severance Beneﬁts
 
As described above in the Compensation Discussion and Analysis, we provide severance beneﬁts as
required by Peruvian and Mexican law, as applicable.
 
Hedging Policy
 
On March 8, 2019, the SEC adopted ﬁnal rules that require companies to disclose any practices or
policies regarding the ability of employees and directors to engage in certain hedging transactions with
respect to the Company’s securities. The SEC rules do not require companies to adopt new hedging
policies or amend previously approved hedging policies. The Securities Law Compliance Policy of the
Company, approved by the Board of Directors on April 23, 2009, provides the following hedging policy:
 
Hedging
 
Certain forms of hedging or monetization transactions (such as zero-cost collars) are complex
transactions that can present unique insider trading risks. Therefore, the Company strongly discourages
board members, oﬃcers, employees, and agents covered by this Policy from engaging in such
transactions. Any such person wishing to enter into such an arrangement must ﬁrst pre-clear the
proposed transaction with the General Counsel, Secretary or Assistant Secretary of SCC, and it is
strongly recommended that such person consult with his or her broker/ﬁnancial advisor and tax advisor.
Any request for pre-clearance of a hedging or similar arrangement must be submitted to the General
Counsel, Secretary or Assistant Secretary of SCC at least two weeks prior to the proposed execution of
documents evidencing the proposed transaction and must set forth a justiﬁcation for the proposed
transaction.
   
Pay Ratio Disclosure
 
As required by the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, the SEC has adopted a
rule requiring us to disclose a ratio of total annual compensation of our median employee to total annual
compensation of our CEO. Based on the methodology described below, the compensation of our median
employee in 2019 was $33,321 and compensation to our CEO was $1,639,870, resulting in a ratio of
CEO pay to median employee pay for ﬁscal year 2019 of 49:1.
 
We used our entire global employee population, other than the CEO, as of a determination date of
December 31, 2019 to estimate the median employee. For estimating the median employee, we used a
Consistently Applied Compensation Measure (CACM) of annual base salary for 2019 with values
converted into U.S. dollars based on the average monthly exchange rate for 2018. We compiled annual
base salary data for all employees and then selected our median employee from a group of employees
with a salary within +/-1% of the median employee under the CACM. Our median employee is a full-
time, hourly employee based in Mexico. After identifying the median employee, we calculated annual
total compensation for this employee using the same methodology we use for our named executive
oﬃcers as disclosed in the Summary Compensation Table.
 
Our pay ratio is a reasonable estimate calculated in a manner consistent with SEC rules based on our
payroll and employment records and the methodology described above. Because the SEC rules allow for
diﬀerent methodologies for determining the ratio, and because work force demographic can vary across
companies, the estimated ratio should not be compared against other publicly-traded companies. There
have been no changes that we reasonably believe would signiﬁcantly aﬀect the pay ratio disclosure set
forth herein.
 
Compensation Policies and Practices and Risk
 
Our Peruvian and Mexican executive oﬃcers and non-executive employees receive cash-based
compensation, which is currently paid. The cash-based compensation has two principal components:
base salary and bonus, which are discretionary, and compensation mandated by Peruvian and Mexican
law. We also sponsor programs to recruit and retain qualiﬁed employees working in Peru and Mexico.
 
 
24
 
 
The payment of bonuses is discretionary and we do not necessarily pay bonuses every year. The
payment of bonuses and the amount of the same depend on numerous factors, including among others,
our ﬁnancial performance, our intensive capital investment plan, our future cash ﬂow generation from
operations, and our liquidity in general. We do not provide compensation tied to speciﬁc pre-determined
individual or Company performance criteria or long-term incentive compensation. The cash incentive
payments granted to our executives and non-executive employees are not based on pre-established
performance targets or on targets that have been previously communicated to the executives or the
employees. The granting of speciﬁc awards and the amount of each award are discretionary and
substantially uncertain until we decide to award them.
 
The decisions to grant salary increases and bonuses for the Named Executive Oﬃcers of the Company
and for non-executive employees are made by our management team and our Compensation
Committee after a thorough analysis of numerous factors, including among others, the responsibilities
and performance of each Named Executive Oﬃcer or employee measured in the areas of production,
expansions and project developments, safety and environmental responsiveness (both individually and
as compared to other oﬃcers or employees of the Company). It is our practice to grant relatively small
salary increases to our Named Executive Oﬃcers commensurate with the cost of living increases in Peru
and Mexico and tailor the amount of the incentive cash payments to balance the amounts of
compensation mandated by Peruvian and Mexican law, principally the amounts received by the Named
Executive Oﬃcers as proﬁt participations. Generally, in years in which the proﬁt participation amounts
paid to Named Executive Oﬃcers are high, the bonus or incentive cash payments will be lower than in
years in which the proﬁt participation amounts are relatively modest. In such years, where the proﬁt
participation amounts are modest, if our ﬁnancial conditions permit, we tend to increase the amount
paid in cash incentives. Without limiting this, from time to time larger discretionary cash bonuses are
granted to our Named Executive Oﬃcers in recognition of a particular Named Executive Oﬃcer’s
performance during the year and to reward him for his leadership, vision and focus. The Company’s
compensation policies or practices do not vary signiﬁcantly from the Company’s overall risk and reward
structure, inasmuch as we do not oﬀer performance-based bonuses or incentive awards which occur
signiﬁcantly before receipt of anticipated income or expiration of associated risk to the Company.  We do
not have business units that account for a signiﬁcant portion of the Company’s risk proﬁle or
compensation policies and practices that vary for a particular business unit.  We continuously monitor
our compensation policies and practices to avoid risk-taking by executive and non-executive employees
to increase their compensation.
 
Compensation Committee Interlock and Insider Participation
 
Messrs. Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco and Alfredo Casar Pérez, our directors representing Grupo Mexico,
are executive oﬃcers and/or directors of Grupo Mexico or its aﬃliates. Messrs. Germán Larrea Mota-
Velasco, Oscar González Rocha, Xavier García de Quevedo Topete, and Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes
comprise the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors. See also “Related Party Transactions.”
 
Compensation of Directors
 
2019 Director Compensation Table
 
Name  Fees Earned
or Paid in
Cash ($) Stock Awards (a)
($)  Total ($)
Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco  $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
Oscar González Rocha   —   —   —
Vicente Ariztegui Andreve  $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
Alfredo Casar Pérez  $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
Enrique Castillo Sánchez
Mejorada  $124,000 $ 58,416  $182,416
Xavier García de Quevedo Topete $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola  $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla  $124,000 $ 58,416  $182,416
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes $99,000 $ 58,416  $157,416
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán  $52,000 $ 58,416  $110,416
 
 
 
 
(a) The dollar value reported is based on the closing stock price of a share of SCC’s common stock on
the NYSE on the May 7, 2019 grant date, which was $36.51.
 
 
25
 
 
Each non-employee director receives compensation in the amount of $20,000 per year and $8,000 for
attendance in person at each meeting of the Board. For committee attendance the fee is $6,000 and if
the participation is by telephone conference the compensation is $1,000 for each meeting. All directors
are reimbursed by us for all meeting related expenses.
 
We have a Directors’ Stock Award Plan which entitles directors who are not compensated as our
employees to an award of 1,600 shares of Common Stock upon election to the Board of Directors and
1,600 additional shares of Common Stock following each annual meeting of stockholders thereafter. The
award is not subject to vesting requirements.
 
The information set forth below reﬂects the shares of our Common Stock granted under the Directors’
Stock Award Plan outstanding and held by each of the directors as of December 31, 2019, except for the
information provided for Mr. Casar Pérez, which is as of April 27, 2020.
 
Southern Copper Corporation
 
   Shares of Common
Stock Beneﬁcially
Owned
Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco   26,166
Oscar González Rocha   1,212
Vicente Ariztegui Andreve   3,200
Alfredo Casar Pérez   0
Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada   0
Xavier García de Quevedo Topete   10,438
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola   4,400
Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla   8,814
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes   23,741
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán   17,474
   
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneﬁcial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
 
Security Ownership of Certain Beneﬁcial Owners
 
Set forth below is certain information with respect to those persons who are known by us to have been,
as of December 31, 2019, beneﬁcial owners of more than ﬁve percent of our outstanding Common
Stock.
 
   Southern Copper Corporation 
   Shares of
Common
Stock
Beneﬁcially
Owned  Percent of
Outstanding
Common
Stock  
Americas Mining Corporation, 1440 E. Missouri
Avenue, Suite 160, Phoenix, AZ 85014(a)   687,275,997  88.9%
 
 
 
 
(a) As reported in Amendment No. 16 to the Schedule 13D ﬁled with the SEC by Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de
C.V. and Americas Mining Corporation on October 31, 2011.  AMC and Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de C.V. share
the power to dispose and vote the shares of our Common Stock. Americas Mining Corporation is wholly-
owned by Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de C.V.
 
26
 
  
Security Ownership of Management
 
The information set forth below as to the shares of our Common Stock beneﬁcially owned by the
nominees, directors and executive oﬃcers named in the Summary Compensation Table below and by all
nominees, directors and executive oﬃcers as a group is stated as of December 31, 2019, except for the
information provided for Mr. Casar Pérez, which is as of April 27, 2020.
 
   Southern Copper Corporation 
 Director/Executive Oﬃcer  Shares of
Common
Stock
Beneﬁcially
Owned(a)  Percent of
Outstanding
Common
Stock  
Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco   3,371,367   (b)
Oscar González Rocha   134,539   (b)
Vicente Ariztegui Andreve   3,200   (b)
Alfredo Casar Pérez   0    
Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada   0    
Edgard Corrales   0    
Xavier García de Quevedo Topete   10,438   (b)
Raúl Jacob   0    
Jorge Lazalde   0    
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola(c)   4,400   (b)
Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla   8,814   (b)
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes   23,741   (b)
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán   17,474   (b)
Lina Vingerhoets   0    
All nominees, directors and executive oﬃcers as a
group (16 individuals)   3,573,973    
 
 
 
 
  (a)Information with respect to beneﬁcial ownership is based upon information furnished by each
nominee, director or executive oﬃcer. All nominees, directors and executive oﬃcers have sole
voting and investment power over the shares beneﬁcially owned by them.
 
  (b)Less than 0.5%.
 
  (c)Mr. Mac Gregor Anciola reported 4,400 shares owned with his wife.
 
In addition, the following information is provided in satisfaction of applicable rules of the SEC. Grupo
Mexico, the indirect majority stockholder of the Company, is a Mexican corporation with its principal
executive oﬃces located at Ediﬁcio Parque Reforma, Campos Eliseos No. 400, 12th Floor, Col. Lomas de
Chapultepec, Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo, Mexico City, C.P. 11000, Mexico. Grupo Mexico’s principal
business is to act as a holding company for shares of other corporations engaged in the mining,
processing, purchase and sale of minerals and other products and railway services. Grupo Mexico shares
are listed on the Mexican Stock Exchange (GMEXICO).
 
The largest shareholder of Grupo Mexico is EIM, a Mexican corporation. The principal business of EIM is
to act as a holding company for shares of other corporations engaged in a variety of businesses
including mining, construction, railways, real estate, and drilling. The Larrea family, including
Mr. Germán Larrea, directly controls the majority of the capital stock of EIM and directly and indirectly
controls a majority of the votes of the capital stock of Grupo Mexico.
 
 
27
 
   
Beneﬁcial Ownership of Grupo Mexico Shares
as of December 31, 2019
 
   Grupo Mexico  
 Director/Executive Oﬃcer  Shares of
Common
Stock
Beneﬁcially
Owned  Percent of
Outstanding
Common
Stock (a) 
Germán Larrea Mota-Velasco   1,747,270,000  22.4%
Oscar González Rocha   3,932,096   (a)
Vicente Ariztegui Andreve   0    
Alfredo Casar Pérez   3,261,271   (a)
Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada   5,000   (a)
Edgard Corrales   36,000   (a)
Xavier García de Quevedo Topete   1,664,651   (a)
Raúl Jacob   146,424   (a)
Jorge Lazalde (b)   310,257   (a)
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola   0    
Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla   0    
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes   0    
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán   70,262   (a)
Lina Vingerhoets   0    
         
All nominees, directors and executive oﬃcers as a
group (16 individuals)   1,756, 695,961    
  
 
 
 
  (a)Less than 0.5%.
 
  (b)Mr. Jorge Lazalde has the right to acquire 15,000 additional Grupo Mexico shares under Grupo
Mexico’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
 
 
28
 
 
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
 
Related Party Transactions
 
In 2019, we had entered into certain transactions in the ordinary course of business with parties that are
controlling stockholders or their aﬃliates. These transactions include the lease of oﬃce space, air and
railroad transportation, construction services, energy supply and other products and services related to
mining and reﬁning. We lend and borrow funds among aﬃliates for acquisitions and other corporate
purposes. These ﬁnancial transactions bear interest and are subject to review and approval by senior
management, as are all related party transactions.
 
Grupo Mexico, our ultimate parent and our majority indirect stockholder, and its aﬃliates, provide
various services to us directly or indirectly through subsidiaries. In 2019, these services were primarily
related to accounting, legal, tax, ﬁnancial, treasury, human resources, price risk assessment and
hedging, purchasing, procurement and logistics, sales and administrative and other support services. In
2018 AMMINCO Apoyo Administrativo, S. A. de C. V. (“AMMINCO”), a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, began
providing such services to our Peruvian operations. We pay Grupo Mexico and AMMINCO for these
services. The total amount paid by us to Grupo Mexico and AMMINCO for such services in 2019 was
$27.8 million. The Company received $0.1 million from AMMINCO. We expect to continue to pay for
these support services in the future.
 
In December 2018, in accordance with the Company´s tax sharing agreement with its parent, the
Company´s Peruvian operations advanced $11 million to AMC for the payment of the Company's GILTI
tax that later was determined not to be necessary. This amount was reimbursed to the Company in the
ﬁrst quarter of 2019.
 
In 2019, our Mexican operations paid $44.1 million primarily for freight services provided by Ferrocarril
Mexicano, S.A. de C.V. and was paid $0.1 million by Ferrocarril, $71.0 million for engineering and
construction services provided by Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V. and aﬃliates, and $202.2
million for power supplied by Mexico Generadora de Energia S. de R.L. (“MGE”), all subsidiaries of Grupo
Mexico. In 2019 the Company received from MGE $47.4 million for natural gas and services. On August
4, 2014, Mexico Generadora de Energia Eolica S. de R.L. de C.V, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico,
located in Oaxaca, Mexico, acquired Eolica el Retiro. Eolica el Retiro (“Eolica”) is a windfarm that has 37
wind turbines. This company started operations in January 2014 and started to sell power to Industrial
Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. and subsidiaries (“IMMSA”) and other subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico in the
third quarter of 2014. Eolica is currently supplying approximately 18.2% of its power output to IMMSA, a
subsidiary of the Company. Our Mexican operations purchased power from Eolica for $2.9 million in
2019.
 
In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, whereby MGE will supply some of
the Company’s Mexican operations with power through 2032. MGE has two natural gas-ﬁred combined
cycle power generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 megawatts and has been supplying
power to us since December 2013. Currently, MGE is supplying approximately 5.2% of its power output
to third-party energy users.
 
In 2019, the Company’s Mexican operations purchased $37.6 million in scrap and other residual copper
mineral and sold $11.4 million in copper cathodes and rod, as well as sulfuric acid, silver and gold to
Asarco LLC, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico.
 
In September 2019, Asarco LLC signed a promissory note to pay to the Company´s Mexican operations
$62.0 million plus interest no later than October 31, 2021, with quarterly payments of $0.5 million. The
annual interest rate of the note is Libor plus 200 basis points, 4.08513%, which will be reviewed
annually. As of December 31, 2019, $59.5 million is recorded as a long-term related party receivable in
the consolidated balance sheet of the Company. Related to this promissory note, the Company recorded
interest income of $2.3 million in 2019.
 
 
29
 
 
In 2019, the Company made donations of $9.6 million to Fundacion Grupo Mexico, an organization
dedicated to promoting the social and economic development of the communities close to the
Company’s Mexican operations.
 
The Larrea family controls a majority of the capital stock of Grupo Mexico, and has extensive interests in
other businesses, including transportation, aviation, entertainment and real estate. We engage in certain
transactions in the ordinary course of business with other entities controlled by the Larrea family relating
to the lease of oﬃce space, air transportation and entertainment services. In 2019, we paid Mexico
Transportes Aereos S.A. de C.V. $2.3 million for aviation services provided to our Mexican operations. The
Company’s Mexican operations paid $0.4 million and $0.2 million to Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A de
C.V. and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. for entertainment services, respectively. These companies
are controlled by the Larrea family. In addition, the Company received $1.8 million, $0.1 million and $0.1
million from Mexico Transportes Aereos S.A. de C.V., Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V., and
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V., respectively, for building rental and maintenance services provided
by our Mexican subsidiary. The Company´s Mexican operations also received $0.2 million from
Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S. A. de C. V. for providing security services.
 
In 2019, we did not have purchase activities with companies having relationships with our executive
oﬃcers.
 
The Company has a 44.2% participation in Compañia Minera Coimolache S.A. (“Coimolache”), which it
accounts for on the equity method. Coimolache owns Tantahuatay, a gold mine located in the northern
part of Peru. Messrs. Gonzalez Rocha, Jacob and Corrales are directors of Coimolache.
 
In addition, the Company has a 30.0% participation in Apu Coropuna S.R.L. (“Apu Coropuna”), which it
accounts for on the equity method. Apu Coropuna is a company, which undertakes exploration activities
in the Pucay prospect, located in Arequipa, Peru. Mr. Edgard Corrales is a member of the management
Committee of Apu Coropuna.
 
Asarco LLC, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, and AMC, the parent of the Company, employ Oscar González
Barron, the son of Oscar González Rocha, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer. Mr. González Barron holds the
position of Chief Financial Oﬃcer at Asarco LLC and received $47,856 as his base salary along with other
employment beneﬁts that are standard for employees of Asarco LLC at that management level, such as
the use of the Company car valued at $4,005. Mr. González Barron did not receive a discretionary cash
bonus from Asarco LLC in 2019. Mr. Oscar González Barron holds the oﬃce of Corporate Director of
Administration and Internal Control at AMC and received a base salary from AMC of $186,900 in 2019.
He also received a cash discretionary bonus from AMC of $39,061 in 2019. Mr. González Barron also
received fees from Grupo Mexico amounting to $10,383 in 2019. Mr. Oscar González Rocha was not
involved in the recruiting or hiring of Mr. Oscar González Barron by Asarco LLC or AMC, nor in any
decision aﬀecting Mr. González Barron’s compensation at Asarco LLC or at AMC.  Mr. Oscar González
Barron’s compensation was established by Asarco LLC and AMC, respectively, in accordance with their
compensation practices applicable to employees with equivalent qualiﬁcations and responsibilities and
holding similar positions.
 
It is anticipated that in the future we will enter into similar transactions with such parties.
 
On February 28, 2017, AMC and the Company entered into a tax agreement (the “Tax Agreement”),
eﬀective as of February 20, 2017, pursuant to which AMC, as the parent of the consolidated group of
which the Company is a member and joins in the ﬁling of a U.S. federal income tax return, (a) will be
responsible for and discharge, any and all liabilities and payments due to the IRS on account of any
incremental tax liabilities of the Company in connection with the potential adjustments being considered
by the IRS in connection with the interest of a 2012 Judgment, (b) will not seek reimbursement,
contribution or collection of any amounts of money or any other asset in connection therewith from the
Company, and (c) will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Company from any such liability,
including the cost of such defense.
 
 
30
 
 
The Audit Committee reviewed the 2019 related party transactions reported in this report and did not
object to any of them. Our Audit Committee recognizes that related party transactions present a
heightened risk of conﬂicts of interest and/or improper valuation (or the perception thereof) and adopted
a written policy for related party transactions on January 24, 2007, and amended it on February 23,
2007, and on April 24, 2008.  During 2019 it was our policy that the Audit Committee shall review all
related party transactions. Related parties were those deﬁned as such by the SEC. We are required to
report all related party transactions in our ﬁlings with the SEC and as required by accounting
requirements.
 
Article Nine of our Certiﬁcate speciﬁcally states: “The Corporation shall not engage in any Material
Aﬃliate Transaction unless it has been the subject of prior review by a committee of the Board of
Directors with at least three members, each of whom is an Independent Director (any such committee,
an “Aﬃliate Transactions Committee”). For purposes of this Article Nine, a “Material Aﬃliate Transaction”
shall mean any transaction, business dealing or material ﬁnancial interest in any transaction, or any
series of related transactions, between Grupo México or one of its aﬃliates (other than the Corporation
or any of the Corporation’s subsidiaries), on the one hand, and the Corporation or one of the
Corporation’s subsidiaries, on the other hand, that involves consideration of more than $10,000,000 in
the aggregate.”
 
During 2019 our policy provided that the Audit Committee may delegate authority to grant such
approvals or ratiﬁcations to one or more members of the Audit Committee with the requirement that
such member or members present any decisions made pursuant to such delegated authority to the full
Audit Committee at its next scheduled meeting.
 
Additionally, during 2019 the policy provided that in transactions where a senior oﬃcer is related to any
of our goods or services provider, the Chairman of the Audit Committee is delegated the authority to
approve the transaction, unless it exceeds an aggregate consideration of more than $500,000.  In the
latter case, prior approval of the Audit Committee members is required.
 
During 2019 our policy provided that in reviewing a related party transaction the Audit Committee had
to consider all of the relevant factors surrounding the transaction, including:
 
(1)       whether there is a valid business reason for us to enter into the related party transaction
consistent with the best interests of the Company and our stockholders;
(2)       whether the transaction is negotiated on an arm’s length basis on terms comparable to those
provided to unrelated third parties or on terms comparable to those provided to employees generally;
(3)       whether the Audit Committee determines that it has been duly apprised of all signiﬁcant
conﬂicts that may exist or may otherwise arise on account of the transaction, and it believes,
nonetheless, that we are warranted in entering into the related party transaction and have developed an
appropriate plan to manage the potential conﬂicts of interest;
(4)       whether the rates or charges involved in the transaction are determined by competitive bids,
or the transaction involves the rendering of services as a common or contract carrier, or public utility, at
rates or charges ﬁxed in conformity with law or governmental authority;
(5)       whether the transaction involves services as a bank depositary of funds, transfer agent,
registrar, trustee under a trust indenture, or similar services; and/or
(6)       whether the interest of the related party or that of a member of the immediate family of the
related party arises solely from the ownership of our class of equity securities and all holders of that
class of our equity securities received the same beneﬁt on a pro rata basis.
 
 
31
 
 
During 2019, management reported all related party transactions to the Audit Committee at each
meeting, including material transactions that require approval or ratiﬁcation. On April 25, 2017, the
Audit Committee created a subcommittee of related party transactions, composed of three of its
members, with the authority to review related party transactions, including material aﬃliate related
party transactions. Material related party transactions are reported to the full Board of Directors. During
2019, our policy provided a presumption that the Audit Committee has approved or ratiﬁed the related
party transaction if it has reviewed the transaction and made no observations or objections to the same.
 
During the second half of 2019, at the direction of the Audit Committee and with the input of the
subcommittee of related party transactions, management undertook to revise our internal policies and
procedures to establish channels of reporting and review and approval requirements for related party
transactions. This revised policy was developed to complement our existing practices covering related
party transactions, including the Audit Committee’s policy described above. While the revised policy
addressed the subject of related party transactions and the potential conﬂict of interest they present
generally, a particular focus of the revised policy is to assist our employee base to identify potential
transactions described by Article Nine of our Certiﬁcate as early as possible and establish a chain of
internal reporting to help ensure that we do not engage in any Material Aﬃliate Transaction (as deﬁned
in Article Nine of our Certiﬁcate) unless that transaction has been the subject of prior review by a
committee of three independent members of our board of directors. This revised policy was approved by
our Board of Directors at its meeting of February 20, 2020.
 
As an example of the revised policy’s enhanced control functions, related party transactions with
consideration between $8,000,000 and $10,000,000 are to be pre-approved by our General Counsel and
Chief Financial Oﬃcer. If the General Counsel and Chief Financial Oﬃcer have any questions about the
consideration amount, they may refer a proposed related party transaction to the committee of three
independent directors for consideration.
 
 Director Independence
 
Messrs. Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla, Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes, and Carlos Ruiz Sacristán are our
special independent directors. Messrs.  Vicente Ariztegui Andreve, Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada
and Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola are our fourth, ﬁfth and sixth independent directors. At its meeting on
February 20, 2020, the Board of Directors approved the nomination of special independent directors
made by the Special Nominating Committee and endorsed the determination made by the Special
Nominating Committee that Messrs. Luis Miguel Palomino Bonilla, Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes, and
Carlos Ruiz Sacristán are independent of management in accordance with the requirements of the NYSE,
as such requirements are interpreted by the Special Nominating Committee and our Board of Directors
in their respective business judgments. The Board of Directors also determined that Messrs.  Vicente
Ariztegui Andreve, Enrique Castillo Sánchez Mejorada and Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola are independent of
management in accordance with the requirements of the NYSE as such requirements are interpreted by
our Board of Directors in its business judgment.
 
 
32
 
  
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services
 
The following is a summary of fees we were or will be billed by Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited (“DTT”)
for professional services rendered for the 2019 and 2018 ﬁscal years, respectively.
 
Fee Category  2019 Fees 2018 Fees 
Audit Fees  $ 1,712,445 $ 1, 670,687 
Audit-Related Fees   241,124  112,171 
Tax Fees   69,084  99,595 
All Other Fees   52,854  11,500 
Total Fees  $ 2,075,507 $ 1,893,953 
 
Audit Fees
 
Audit Fees consist of fees for professional services rendered by DTT for the audit of our ﬁnancial
statements and those of our subsidiaries in Mexico and Peru, as well as our subsidiary in Argentina, and
of our branches in Peru and Chile, which are included in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, fees for the
review of the ﬁnancial statements included in our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and fees for services
that are customarily rendered in connection with statutory and regulatory ﬁlings, including services in
connection with the audit of the eﬀectiveness of our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting required by
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. For the ﬁscal years of 2019 and 2018, the Company paid a total of
$1,712,445 and $1,670,687, respectively in Audit Fees.
 
Audit-Related Fees
 
Audit-Related Fees consist of fees for assurance and related services provided by DTT, not described
above under “Audit Fees,” in connection with the performance of the review and audit of the quarterly
and annual ﬁnancial statements of the Company, due diligence services and attest services not required
by statute or regulation, and consultation concerning ﬁnancial accounting and reporting standards,
which amounted to $241,124 in the 2019 ﬁscal year and $112,171 in the 2018 ﬁscal year.
 
Tax Fees
 
Tax Fees for the 2019 ﬁscal year consisted of $69,084for assistance on various tax issues, including on
Minera Mexico tax incentive analysis. Tax Fees for the 2018 ﬁscal year consisted of $99,595 for
assistance on various tax issues, including on Minera Mexico transfer pricing.
 
 
All Other Fees
 
In 2019 the Company paid $52,854 principally for consulting fees for advice on Toquepala social
responsibility issues. In the 2018 ﬁscal year the Company paid $11,500 for All Other Fees.
 
Audit Committee Pre-Approval Policies and Procedures
 
Our management deﬁnes and communicates speciﬁc projects and categories of service for which the
advance approval of the Audit Committee is requested. The Audit Committee reviews these requests
and advises management if it approves the engagement of the independent accountants. On July 19,
2010, the Audit Committee decided that management could engage the services of the independent
accountants for special projects in amounts up to $30,000, provided they would be approved at the next
scheduled Audit Committee meeting. Management could only engage the services of the independent
accountants for up to two special projects each calendar year, not exceeding $60,000. For services
between $30,000 and $60,000, the services would have to be approved by the Chairman of the Audit
Committee and would have to be reported to the full Audit Committee at the next scheduled Audit
Committee meeting.  For services in excess of $60,000, the full approval of the entire Audit Committee
would be required previous to the engagement. In 2019, all services provided by DTT were approved in
advance by the Audit Committee.
 
 
33
 
 
PART IV.
 
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statements, Schedule
 
The following exhibits are ﬁled as part of this report:
 
   
 1. Exhibits:
 
31.1 Certiﬁcation Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
31.2 Certiﬁcation Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
34
 
  
Signatures
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, the Registrant has duly caused this Report on Form 10-K/A to be signed on its behalf by the
undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
   
  SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
  (Registrant)
   
  /s/ Raul Jacob
  Raul Jacob
  Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief
Financial Oﬃcer
   
April 29, 2020  
 
 
35
 
 
